Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Division of Family and Children’s Services

§ 43-1-51.
Creation of division; areas of responsibility.

There is hereby created within the Department of Human Services a single and separate Division of Family and Children’s Services. The division shall be responsible for the development, execution and provision of services in the following areas: (a) protective services for children; (b) foster care; (c) adoption services; (d) special services; (e) interstate compact; (f) licensure; and (g) such services as may be designated by the board. Employees working within the division shall be limited to work within the areas of service enumerated herein. Services enumerated under Section 43-15-13 et seq. for the foster care program shall be provided by qualified staff with appropriate case loads.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 500, § 36; Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 65; Laws, 1998, ch. 516, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 541, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2008.

§ 43-1-53.
Organization of division; qualifications of director.

The Division of Family and Children’s Services shall be formed at each level of the Department of Human Services, including state, regional and county levels. The Executive Director of the Department of Human Services shall appoint and employ a director for the division who shall have a Master’s Degree in a field related to children’s services. In addition, he shall have no less than three (3) years’ experience in the field of service to children. In lieu of such degree and experience, he shall have a minimum of ten (10) years’ actual experience in the field of children’s services.

The state office of the Division of Family and Children’s Services shall develop policy, provide training and oversee the implementation of services. The director shall establish such planning and policy councils as may be necessary to carry out these functions.

The regional office of the Division of Family and Children’s Services shall consist of a regional services director and a crisis intervention team to be dispatched on a case-by-case basis by the regional services director. From and after July 1, 1998, the Department of Human Services shall at a minimum employ and assign to the Division of Family and Children’s Services two (2) additional regional services directors for supervision of the foster care program.

Area offices. Each region shall be divided into three (3) areas, each of which shall have two (2) supervisors and direct service workers deployed at the county level, but not limited in jurisdiction to that county.

Counties. The area supervisors shall assign service workers so that every county has an appropriate access point for all services.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 500, § 37; Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 66; Laws, 1998, ch. 516, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 31, 1998).

§ 43-1-55.
Standards for employment and service delivery; Training and Testing Advisory Council created; duties; membership; meetings; chairperson; quorum [Repealed effective July 1, 2019].

The Office of Family and Children’s Services and the Division of Aging and Adult Services shall devise formal standards for employment as a family protection worker and as a family protection specialist within their respective offices and for service delivery designed to measure the quality of services delivered to clients, as well as the timeliness of services. Each family protection worker and family protection specialist shall be assessed annually by a supervisor who is a licensed social worker who is knowledgeable in the standards promulgated. The standards devised by each office shall be applicable to all family protection workers and family protection specialists working under that office.

The Office of Family and Children’s Services shall devise formal standards for family protection workers of the Department of Human Services who are not licensed social workers. Those standards shall require that:

In order to be employed as a family protection worker, a person must have a bachelor’s degree in either psychology, sociology, nursing, family studies, or a related field, or a graduate degree in either psychology, sociology, nursing, criminal justice, counseling, marriage and family therapy or a related field. The determination of what is a related field shall be made by certification of the State Personnel Board; and

Before a person may provide services as a family protection worker, the person shall complete four (4) weeks of intensive training provided by the training unit of the Office of Family and Children’s Services, and shall take and receive a passing score on the certification test administered by the training unit upon completion of the four-week training. Upon receiving a passing score on the certification test, the person shall be certified as a family protection worker by the Department of Human Services. Any person who does not receive a passing score on the certification test shall not be employed or maintain employment as a family protection worker for the department. Further, a person, qualified as a family protection worker through the procedures set forth above, shall not conduct forensic interviews of children until the worker receives additional specialized training in child forensic interview protocols and techniques by a course or curriculum approved by the Department of Human Services to be not less than forty (40) hours.

For the purpose of providing services in child abuse or neglect cases, youth court proceedings, vulnerable adults cases, and such other cases as designated by the Executive Director of Human Services, the caseworker or service provider shall be a family protection specialist or a family protection worker whose work is overseen by a family protection specialist who is a licensed social worker.

The Department of Human Services and the Office of Family and Children’s Services shall seek to employ and use family protection specialists to provide the services of the office, and may employ and use family protection workers to provide those services only in counties in which there is not a sufficient number of family protection specialists to adequately provide those services in the county.

There is created a Training and Testing Advisory Council to review the department’s program of training and testing of family protection workers and to make recommendations pertaining to the program to the department. The advisory council shall be composed of the following ten (10) members: two (2) employees of the department appointed by the Executive Director of Human Services, including one (1) representative of the Office of Family and Children’s Services and one (1) representative of the Division of Aging and Adult Services; the Chairman of the Consortium of Accredited Schools of Social Work in Mississippi; and the executive director or a board member of a professional association or licensing board for each field of study named in subsection (2)(a) of this section, as follows: the Mississippi Chapter of the National Association of Social Workers; a marriage and family therapist who is a member of the Board of Examiners for Social Workers and Marriage and Family Therapists, to be selected by the four (4) members of the board of examiners who are marriage and family therapists; the Mississippi Nurses Association; the Mississippi Prosecutors Association; the Mississippi Counseling Association; the Mississippi Psychological Association; and an officer of the Alabama-Mississippi Sociological Association who is a Mississippi resident elected by the executive committee of the association. The executive director of each association (excluding the Alabama-Mississippi Sociological Association) and chairman of the consortium may designate an alternate member to serve in his stead on the advisory council. Members of the advisory council shall serve without salary or per diem.

A majority of the advisory council members shall select from their membership a chairperson to preside over meetings and a vice chairperson to preside in the absence of the chairperson or when the chairperson is excused. The advisory council shall adopt procedures governing the manner of conducting its business. A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum to do business.

This section and Section 43-27-107, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall stand repealed on July 1, 2019.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 500, § 38; Laws, 2004, ch. 489, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 589, § 2; Laws, 2006, ch. 600, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 364, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 461, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 470, § 6; Laws, 2015, ch. 403, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 43-1-57.
Recordkeeping procedures; uniform intake procedure.

The Division of Family and Children’s Services shall establish a record-keeping procedure to insure that all referrals of neglect and/or abuse are accurately and adequately maintained for future or cross-reference.

In addition to the toll-free abuse reporting telephone system, the division shall establish a uniform intake procedure for the receipt and referral to the appropriate personnel for investigation. The uniform intake procedure shall be made available to all appropriate agencies and the public in order to facilitate the necessary protective services.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 500, § 39, eff from and after July 1, 1986.

§ 43-1-59.
Allocation of departmental resources.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the resources devoted to family and children’s services and to public assistance programs be clearly delineated and that all resources intended for child protection and other related purposes be expended in service of that goal.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 500, § 40; Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 67, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 43-1-61.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 500, § 41(4), eff from and after January 1, 1987.

[Laws, 1986, ch. 500, § 41]

§ 43-1-63.
Interdepartmental sharing of resources and services for preventing and detecting child abuse and neglect.

The Department of Human Services shall have the authority to use the services and resources of the State Department of Education and the State Department of Health and of all other appropriate state departments, agencies, institutions or political subdivisions as will aid in carrying out the purposes of this chapter. It shall be the duty of all such state departments, agencies and institutions to make available such services and resources to the department, including, but not necessarily limited to, such services and resources as may be required to perform appropriate criminal history record checks on prospective foster and relative child placements for the purpose of preventing and detecting abuse and neglect.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 509, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 43-1-65.
Mississippi Child Care Quality Step System established by requiring Department of Human Services Office for Children and Youth to develop and implement pilot voluntary quality rating system (QRS).

The Department of Human Services shall establish the Mississippi Child Care Quality Step System by requiring the Office for Children and Youth of the Department of Human Services, the lead agency for the Child Care and Development Fund (CCDF), to develop and implement a pilot voluntary Quality Rating System (QRS). The purpose of the pilot system will be to improve the quality of all licensed early care and education and after-school programs. The system is to be phased in over the next five (5) years beginning July 1, 2006, subject to appropriation. The QRS criteria will be the basis, at minimum, for the QRS, and shall address the following components: administrative policy, professional development, learning environment, and parental involvement and evaluation.

In addition, the Office for Children and Youth shall develop and administer funds, based on appropriation, to create a Child Care Resource and Referral (CCR& R) statewide system in collaboration with community and junior colleges, universities, Mississippi Public Broadcasting, state agencies and/or nonprofit community entities. The CCR& R agencies shall provide training specific to the QRS criteria to enable early care and education program quality to improve as measured by the QRS system; and offer parent education information and training on what a quality early care and education program comprises and how to identify one. This program shall begin July 1, 2006, subject to appropriation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 504, § 16; reenacted without change, Laws, 2009, ch. 345, § 35, eff from and after June 30, 2009.

§ 43-1-67.
Office of Children and Youth to conduct needs assessment to determine need for program to provide incentives to certain teachers/directors who make educational advancements listed in QRS criteria.

The Office for Children and Youth of the Department of Human Services shall conduct a needs assessment to determine the need for an incentive program, which would allow participating early care and education programs in the Quality Rating System (QRS) access to funds to provide incentives to teachers/directors that make educational advancements that are listed in the QRS criteria. If determined to be feasible and depending on the availability of funds, guidelines for such an incentive program shall be developed by the Office for Children and Youth.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 504, § 17; reenacted without change, Laws, 2009, ch. 345, § 36, eff from and after June 30, 2009.